Louisiana, session 2026, HB268.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:183.2(A), 2925(B)(1), and 3005(C)(8) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 17:2926(A)(5) and 3996(B)(24), (30), (44), and (51) are hereby enacted
to read as follows:
§183.2. Career option description
A.(1) To prepare students for choosing a career option at the high school
level, in grades six through eight, schools shall incorporate activities which expose
students to career and technical and academic fields of study. Such activities may
include field trips, guest speakers, community services, and other activities designed
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 268 ENROLLED
to introduce students to occupations in demand in Louisiana. At least six activities
shall be conducted at each grade level during each school year as provided in
Paragraph (2) of this Subsection. Louisiana Works shall provide annually a listing
of high-demand sectors by region and state to public school governing authorities,
which shall select activities that align with these sectors to the greatest extent
feasible.
(2)(a) Each school year, at least three of the six activities for each grade level
shall meet one of the following criteria:
(i) An activity that provides direct interaction with an employer.
(ii) An activity that involves career pathway instruction linked to high school
course options.
(iii) An activity that provides a work-based learning exposure.
(iv) A career interest inventory.
(b) At least one activity shall be documented for each school year in each
student's Individual Graduation Plan developed pursuant to R.S. 17:2925.
(3) Each school that enrolls students in grades kindergarten through five
shall provide students with at least one career awareness experience or activity in a
category provided in Subparagraph (2)(a) of this Subsection during each school year.
(4) Each school board shall certify annual compliance for the schools under
its jurisdiction to the state Department of Education and maintain auditable records
of activities by grade relative to the requirements of Paragraphs (1) through (3) of
this Subsection.
* * *
§2925. Individual graduation plans
* * *
B. To provide a foundation for the development of the Individual Graduation
Plan, schools shall:
(1) Provide career awareness and exploration activities to all students in
grades six through eight that create linkages between what a student does in school
and what he wants to achieve in life. Such activities shall include career interest
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 268 ENROLLED
inventories in sixth grade and updated career interest inventories in seventh and
eighth grades and information to assist them in the career decisionmaking process
and may include job shadowing, job mentoring, and job internships. as provided in
R.S. 17:183.2(A).
* * *
§2926. Student counseling; training and professional development
A. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education shall develop
an advisement policy for the middle and high school grades that local school districts
can use to equip school counselors with the skills and information needed to:
* * *
(5) Document at least one middle school career-related activity in the
student's Individual Graduation Plan as provided in R.S. 17:183.2(A) and ensure that
career interest inventories are updated in seventh and eighth grades as provided in
R.S. 17:2925(B).
* * *
§3005. Elementary school counselors; availability; guidelines; requirements;
counseling services; work time; exceptions; reporting; funding
* * *
C. Such school counselors shall provide preventive and developmental
counseling services to all public elementary school students in kindergarten through
grade six in order to prepare them for middle, junior, and senior high school
responsibilities and their social and physical development. In providing such
counseling services, the counselors may:
* * *
(8) Consult with teachers in implementing a career development program
which, at the elementary school level, includes self-awareness, job awareness, and
prevocational orientation and in providing that students in kindergarten through fifth
grade participate in at least one career awareness experience or activity during each
school year as provided in R.S. 17:183.2(A).
* * *
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 268 ENROLLED
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(24) Career-related activities, R.S. 17:183.2(A).
* * *
(30) Career-related activities, R.S. 17:2925(B)(1).
* * *
(44) School counselor documentation of career-related activities,
R.S. 17:2926(A)(5).
* * *
(51) School counselor consultation with teachers on career-related activities,
R.S. 17:3005(C)(8).
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.